src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
### Finite verbs
All verb analyses contain voice marking. For finite verb forms active voice
is tied to personal forms and passive voice to non-personal verb endings.
The voice is also marked in the infinite verb forms.
Further reading: [VISK § 110](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=110)
* `+Act `: Active voice
* `+Pss `: Passive voice

It is the first analysis of verb strings:
* *kudot:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2`

Finite verb form analyses have a reading for tense. The tense has two values.
For moods other than indicative the tense is not distinctive in surface form,
and therefore not marked in the analyses.
The morphologically distinct forms in Finnish are only past and non-past
tenses, while other are created syntactically and not marked in morphological
analyses.
Further reading: [VISK § 111](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=111)
– 112
* `+Prs `: Non-past (present)
* `+Prt `: Past (preterite)

The tense is marked in indicative forms after mood:
* *kudon:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *kudoin:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`

Finite verb form analyses have a reading for mood. Mood has four central
readings and few archaic and marginal. The mood is marked in analyses for
all finite forms, even the unmarked indicative.
Further reading: [VISK § 115](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=115)
– 118
* `+Ind `: Common moods: Indicative
* `+Cond `: Conditional
* `+Pot `: Potential
* `+Imprt `: Imperative
* `+Opt `: Archaic moods: Optative
* `+Eventv `: Eventive

The mood is after voice in the analysis string and in morph order:
* *kutonen:* `kutoa+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`

Finite verb form analyses have a reading for person. Personal ending of verb
defines the actors.  The person analysis has seven possible values,
six for the singular and plural groups of first, second and third person
forms, and one specifically for passive. The passive personal form is encoded
as fourth person passive, which had been the common practice in past systems.
Further reading: [VISK § 106](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=106)
– 107
* `+Sg1 `: First singular
* `+Sg2 `: Second singular
* `+Sg3 `: Third singular
* `+Pl1 `: First plural
* `+Pl2 `: Second plural
* `+Pl3 `: Third plural

The person is the last required analysis for verbs, after the mood:
* *kudon:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`
* *kudot:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2`
* *kutoo:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3`
* *kudomme:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1`
* *kudotte:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2`
* *kutovat:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3`

### Negation and verbs
The analyses of verb for the forms that require negation verb have a special
analysis for it.
* `+ConNeg `: Connegative form

* *kudo:* `kutoa+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg`

The suitable negation verbs have sub-analysis that can be matched to negated
forms on syntactic level.
* `+Neg `: Negation verb

* *ei:* `ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg3`

### Infinite verb forms
Infinitive verb forms have infinitive or nominal derivation analyses.
In traditional grammars the infinitive forms were called I, II, III, IV and V
infinitive, the modern grammar replaces the first three with A, E and MA
respectively. The IV infinitive, which has *minen* suffix marker, has been
re-analysed as derivational and this is reflected in |omorfi|. The V
infinitive is also assumed to be mainly derivational, but included here for
reference.
Further reading: [VISK § 120](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=120)
– 121
The infinitives have limited nominal inflection.
* `+InfA `: A infinitive (first)
* `+InfE `: E infinitive (second)
* `+InfMa `: MA infinitive (third)
* `+Der/minen `: minen derivation (fourth)
* `+Der/maisilla `: maisilla derivation (fifth)

Infinitive analysis comes after voice, followed by nominal analyses:
* *kutoa:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`
* *kutoessa:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`
* *kutomatta:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfMa+Sg+Abe`
* *kutominen:* `kutoa+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom`
* *kutomaisillani:* `kutoa+V+Act+Der/maisilla+PxSg1`

### Participles
Participial verb forms have participle readings. There are 4 participle
forms. Like infinitives, participles in traditional grammars were named
I and II where NUT and VA are used in modern grammars.  The agent and
negation participle have sometimes been considered outside regular
inflection, but in modern Finnish grammars are alongside other participles
and so they are included in inflection in omorfi as well. In some grammars
the NUT and VA participles have been called past and present participles
respectively, drawing parallels from other languages. The modern grammar
avoids them as misleading but this description uses them
Further reading: [VISK § 122](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=122)
* `+PrfPrc `: NUT participle (first, perfect)
* `+PrsPrc `: VA participle (second, present)
* `+NegPrc `: Negation participle
* `+AgPrc `: Agent partiicple

Participle analyses are right after voice, followed by adjectival analyses:
* *kutonut:* `kutoa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *kutova:* `kutoa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *kutomaton:* `kutoa+V+NegPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *kutomani:* `kutoa+V+AgPrc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

There are number of implementations that mix up MA infinitives and Agent
participles, and they share part of the same forms but no semantics and very
little of syntax.

### Comparation
Adjective and some adverbial analyses are marked for comparation. The
non-marked forms are comparative and superlative. For adjectives, comparative
suffixes precede the nominal inflection.
c.f. [VISK § 300](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=300)
* `+Comp `: Comparative
* `+Superl `: Superlative (was +Sup, now standardised)

The comparison analysis occupies derivation spot, after POS:
* *nopeampi:* `nopea+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *nopein:* `nopea+A+Sup+Sg+Nom`

### Enclitic focus particles
All word forms can have clitics which are analysed by their orthography.
Clitics are suffixes which can attach almost anywhere in the ends of words,
both verb forms and nominals. They also attach on end of other clitics,
theoretically infinite chains. In practice it is usual to see at most three
in one word form. Two clitics have limited use: -s only appears in few
verb forms and combined to other clitics and -kA only appears with few
adverbs and negation verb.
[VISK § 126](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=126) – 131
* `+Foc/han `: -hAn; affirmative etc.
* `+Foc/kaan `: -kAAn; "neither"
* `+Foc/kin `: -kin; "also"
* `+Foc/pa `: -pA; "indeed"
* `+Foc/s `: -s; polite?
* `+Foc/ka `: -kA; "nor"
* `+Qst `: -kO: Question focus

### Derivation
The derivation is not a central feature of this morphology, it is mainly
used to collect new roots for dictionaries. This is roughly in order of
perceived productivity already:
* `+Der/sti `: Common derivations: A→Adv (in A manner)
* `+Der/ja `: V→N (doer of V)
* `+Der/inen `: N→A (containing N)
* `+Der/lainen `: N→A (style of N)
* `+Der/tar `: N→N (feminine N)
* `+Der/llinen `: N→N (consisting of N)
* `+Der/ton `: N→A (without N)
* `+Der/tse `: N→Adp (via N)
* `+Der/vs `: A→N (quality of A)
* `+Der/u `: V→N (act of V)
* `+Der/ttain `: N→Adv (by amounts of N)
* `+Der/ttaa `: V→V (make someone do V)
* `+Der/tattaa `: V→V (make someone do V; "first indirection")
* `+Der/tatuttaa `: V→V (make someone do V; "second indirection")
* `+Der/uus `: A→N (A-ness)
* `+Der/nti `: V→N (regular derivation from all but 2 -da/-dä V)

### Usage
The analyses of some words and word-forms indicate limitedness of usage.
This includes common mispellings, archaic words and forms
and otherwise rare words and forms. Especially, the forms that are in
parentheses in lexical sources and word-forms that had the usage annotation
in there have been carried over.
* `+Err/Orth `: Sub-standard usage
* `+Err/Hyph		        `:
* `+Err/Lex		        `:
* `+Err/SpaceCmp	        `:
* `+Err/MissingSpace	        `:

* `+Use/Marg`: Marginal
* `+Use/Rare  `: Rare
* `+Use/NG   `: Do not generate
* `+Use/GC   `: Do not generate
* `+Use/Hyphen `: With hyphens
* `+Use/NoHyphens `: With hyphens

* **+Use/PMatch** means that the following is only used in the analyser feeding the disambiguator. This is missing.
* `+Use/-PMatch	        `:
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

* `+Use/-Spell		        `:
* `+Use/Arch		        `:
* `+Use/SpellNoSugg        `:
* `+Use/Circ		        `:

Usage tags are pushed wherever appropriate:
* *nallein:* `nalle+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare`

###  Homonym tags

* `+v1				        `:
* `+v2				        `:

### Dialects
The informal language use contains different Finnish than the literary
standard, this is marked as standard dialect (yleispuhekieli):
common features include
dropping final vowels, dropping final i components of unstressed diphtongs,
few other shortenings.
Other dialects are also sometimes analysed;
the geographical division has three levels:
East versus West,
East containing Savo and South-East (North?)
West containing North, perä, keski and eteläpohjalaiset, southwest and Häme
The third level dialect division is traditionally by "town" borders, be
cautious when adding these though; it's not the main target of this
mrophology.

* `+Dial `: any unclassified dialect
* `+Dial/Standard `: standard spoken Finnish
* `+Dial/East `: Eastern dialects
* `+Dial/West `: Western dialects
* `+Dial/Southwest `: South-western dialects
* `+Dial/Häme `: Tavastian dialects
* `+Dial/Eteläpohjalaiset `: South Osthrobotnian dialects
* `+Dial/Keskipohjalaiset `: Middle Osthrobotnian dialects
* `+Dial/Peräpohjalaiset `: North Osthrobotnian dialects
* `+Dial/North `: North Finnish dialects
* `+Dial/Savo `: Savonian dialects
* `+Dial/Southeast `: South-eastern dialects

### Tags for language of unassimilated name
* `+OLang/ENG		        `:
* `+OLang/eng		        `: is a typo, FIX
* `+OLang/FIN		        `:
* `+OLang/NNO		        `:
* `+OLang/NOB		        `:
* `+OLang/RUS		        `:
* `+OLang/SMA		        `:
* `+OLang/SME		        `:
* `+OLang/SWE		        `:
* `+OLang/UND		        `:

### Compounding tags

The tags are of the following form:
* **+CmpNP/xxx** - Normative (N), Position (P), ie the tag describes what
position the tagged word can be in in a compound
* **+CmpN/xxx**  - Normative (N) **form** ie the tag describes what
form the tagged word should use when making compounds
* **+Cmp/xxx**   - Descriptive compounding tags, ie tags that *describes*
what form a word actually is using in a compound

This entry / word should be in the following position(s):

* **+CmpNP/All** - ... in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
* **+CmpNP/First** - ... only be first part in a compound or alone
* **+CmpNP/Pref** - ... only **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* **+CmpNP/Last** - ... only be last part in a compound or alone
* **+CmpNP/Suff** - ... only **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* **+CmpNP/None** - ... does not take part in compounds
* **+CmpNP/Only** - ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never
be used alone, but can appear in any position

If unmarked, any position goes.

The tagged part of the compound should make a compound using:

* **+CmpN/SgN** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgG** Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlG** Plural Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlN** Plural Nominative, propers!

Unmarked = Default, ie `+CmpN/SgN` for SME.

The second part of the compound may require that the previous (left part) is:

* **+CmpN/SgNomLeft** Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgGenLeft** Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlGenLeft** Plural Genitive

### These tags describe the parts of the compound.

The prefix (before "/") is **Cmp**.
